Massachusetts, session 194th, H2435.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 244, the 
following section:- 
Section 245. The department of public health shall conduct a review and issue a report on 
variants of the apolipoprotein L 1 (APOL 1) gene associated with increased risk of end-stage 
renal disease. The report must include: 
(1) Recommendations on how to increase awareness for APOL 1, including screening 
and genetic testing; 
(2) An analysis of strategies and funding to increase screening and genetic testing for 
APOL 1 in the commonwealth; and 
(3) Other relevant information or issues identified by the department. 

of 2 11  The department of public health shall file the report with the clerks of the house of 
representatives and the senate and the joint committee on public health no later than December 
31, 2026.